Utah statutes.
53-1-107.   Commissioner of public safety -- Appointment -- Qualifications
-- Salary.
(1)  The chief executive officer of the department is the commissioner.
(2) (a)  Every fourth year after the year 1989, the governor shall appoint a
commissioner with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  The commissioner shall serve for a period of four years from July 1 of
the year of his appointment.
(3)  The commissioner shall:
(a)  be an individual of recognized executive and administrative capacity;
(b)  be selected solely with regard to his qualifications and fitness to
discharge the duties of the commissioner's office;
(c)  be of high moral character;
(d)  be of good standing in the community in which he lives; and
(e)  have been a resident of this state for a period of at least five years
immediately prior to his appointment.
(4)  The commissioner shall devote full time to the duties of the office.
(5)  The governor shall establish the commissioner's salary within the salary
range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer
Compensation.
